District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.15

Repealed

Shares — Subscriptions; irrevocability; payment.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 186, ch. 269, § 15
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-908b.
1981 Ed., § 29-315.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.15.